North Dakota, session 69, SB2296.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 57-40.6-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
57-40.6-01. Definitions.
In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
1. "911 system" means a set of networks, software applications, databases, call answering
components, and operations and management procedures required to provide 911 services.
2. "911 system service provider" means an entity that provides the systems and support
necessary to enable 911 calling for one or more public safety answering points in a specific
geographic area. A 911 system service provider may provide the systems and support for
either enhanced 911 or next generation 9-1-1.
3. "Assessed communications service" means a software service, communication connection,
cable or broadband transport facilities, or a combination of these facilities, between a billed
retail end user and a service provider's network that provides the end user, upon contacting
911, access to a public safety answering point through a permissible interconnection to the
dedicated 911 network. The term includes telephone exchange access service, wireless
service, and voice over internet protocol service.
4. "Automated notification system" means that portion of a telecommunications system that
provides rapid notice of emergency situations to the public.
5. "Commissioner" means the state tax commissioner.
6. "Communication connection" means a telephone access line, wireless access line, unique
voice over internet protocol service connection, or functional equivalent uniquely identifiable
by a number, internet address, or other designation.
7. "Consumer" means a person who purchases prepaid wireless service in a retail transaction.
8. "Emergency services communication system" means a comprehensive statewide or
countywide system, which provides rapid public access for coordinated dispatching of public
safety services. The system includes a 911 system or radio system.
9. "FCC order" means federal communications commission order 94-102 [961 Federal Register
40348] and any other FCC order that affects the provision of wireless enhanced 911 service.
10. "First responder" means an individual trained to provide assistance during an emergency,
including a firefighter as defined under section 18 - 11 - 03, law enforcement officer as defined
under section 12.1 - 01 - 04, emergency medical services personnel as defined under section
23 - 27 - 02, and public safety telecommunicators .

S. B. NO. 2296 - PAGE 2
11. "Prepaid wireless emergency 911 fee" means the fee that is required to be collected by a
seller from a consumer in the amount established under section 57-40.6-14.
11.12. "Prepaid wireless service" means any telecommunications service that provides the right to
use a mobile wireless service as well as other nontelecommunications services, including the
download of digital products delivered electronically, content and ancillary services, which are
paid for in advance and sold in predetermined units or dollars which decline with use in a
known amount.
12.13. "Prepaid wireless service provider" means any person that provides prepaid wireless
telecommunications service pursuant to a license issued by the federal communications
commission.
13.14. "Public safety answering point" or "PSAP" means a communications facility or combination of
facilities which first receives 911 calls from persons in a 911 service area and which, as
appropriate, may directly dispatch public safety services or extend, transfer, or relay 911 calls
to appropriate public safety agencies.
14.15. "Public safety answering point service area" means the geographic area for which a public
safety answering point has dispatch and emergency communications responsibility.
15.16. "Public safety services" means personnel, equipment, and facilities used by law enforcement,
fire, medical,first responders or other supporting services used in providing a public safety
response to an incident.
16.17. "Public safety telecommunicator" means an individual whose primary full-time or part-time
duties are receiving, processing, and transmitting public safety information received through
an emergency services communication system.
17.18. "Radio system" means a set of networks, software applications, databases, radio components
and infrastructure, and operations and management procedures required to provide
communication services.
18.19. "Retail transaction" means the purchase of prepaid wireless service from a seller for any
purpose other than resale.
19.20. "Seller" means a person who sells prepaid wireless services to a consumer.
20.21. "Subscriber service address" means, for purposes of telephone exchange access service and
voice over internet protocol service subscribers, the address where the subscriber's
communication device is used and, for purposes of wireless subscribers, the place of primary
use, as that term is defined in section 57-34.1-02.
21.22. "Telephone access line" means the principal access to the telephone company's switched
network, including an outward dialed trunk or access register.
22.23. "Telephone exchange access service" means service to any wire line telephone access line
identified by a unique telephone number that provides local wire line access to the
telecommunications network to a service subscriber and which enables the subscriber to
access the emergency services communications system by dialing the digits 9-1-1 on the
subscriber's telephone device.
23.24. "Unpublished" means information that is not published or available from directory assistance.
24.25. "Voice over internet protocol service" means a service that enables real-time two-way voice
communications; requires a broadband connection from the user's location; requires internet
protocol-compatible customer premises equipment; and permits users generally to receive
calls that originate on the public switched telephone network and to terminate calls to the
public switched telephone network.

S. B. NO. 2296 - PAGE 3
25.26. "Wireless access line" means each active wireless and prepaid wireless telephone number
assigned to a commercial mobile radio service subscriber, including end users of resellers.
26.27. "Wireless enhanced 911 service" means the service required to be provided by wireless
service providers pursuant to the FCC order.
27.28. "Wireless service" means commercial mobile radio service as defined in 47 U.S.C. 332(d)(1)
and includes:
a. Services commonly referred to as wireless; and
b. Services provided by any wireless real-time two-way voice communication device,
including radio-telephone communications used in:
(1) Cellular telephone service;
(2) Personal communications service; or
(3) The functional or competitive equivalent of a radio-telephone communications line
used in cellular telephone service, personal communications service, or a network
radio access line.
28.29. "Wireless service provider" means any entity authorized by the federal communications
commission to provide wireless service within this state.

S. B. NO. 2296 - PAGE 4
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2296.
Senate Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 0 Absent 2
House Vote: Yeas 84 Nays 6 Absent 4
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State